Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1727
Family resource centers; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that family resource centers be considered a priority in the utilization of the federal funding allocated to Nebraska through Family Preservation and Support Services, as provided by Public Law 103-66, 1993.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 27.